Wyoming statutes. Title 30 Mines and Minerals
Article 5. Ventilation and Dust Control

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

58 C.J.S. Mines and Minerals § 380.

§ 30-3-501.
Ventilation regulations generally; quantity of air required; record of measurements.

The operator shall provide and maintain, at all times, for all persons in every working place, a good and sufficient amount of ventilation circulating an adequate quantity of fresh air sufficient to dilute and render harmless any noxious gases or powder smoke that may be present.

The number of men on a split shall be no more than the ventilation system can support. Where dust or fumes in harmful quantities result from mining, milling or processing operations, some mechanical or other means which will alleviate this condition shall be used wherever and whenever practical. The operator shall furnish and encourage the use of personal protective devices for alleviating harmful effects of dust and fumes. Each person shall use the devices furnished by the operator.

The quantity of air reaching the last open crosscut in any pair or set of entries shall not be less than nine thousand (9,000) cubic feet a minute. However, the quantity of air reaching the last open crosscut in any pair or set of entries in pillar sections may be less than nine thousand (9,000) cubic feet of air a minute, if at least nine thousand (9,000) cubic feet of air a minute is being delivered to the intake end of the pillar line. In any underground mine, the operator shall provide on the surface or underground a fan or other mechanical means for producing and controlling air circulation within the mine.

The air current at working faces shall under any condition have a sufficient volume and velocity to dilute and carry away smoke from blasting and any flammable or harmful gases.

At least once each week, the mine foreman or other certified persons designated by him, shall measure the volume of air near the main intake or main return, the amount passing through the last open crosscut of entries, and the volume of air in each split. A record of these measurements shall be kept in a book on the surface and shall be open for inspection by interested persons.

The main-intake and main-return air currents in mines shall be in separate openings.

All slopes or entries in coal mines shall be driven in sets of two (2) or more.

In gassy mines haulage roads shall be in intake air.

Battery-charging stations and transformer stations containing liquid-filled transformers shall be well ventilated by separate splits of air conducted through vents to the return air courses and returning direct to the surface.

Changes in ventilation that materially affect the main air current or any split thereof shall be made when the mine is idle and with no men in the mine, other than those engaged in changing the ventilation.

In gassy mines air that has passed through abandoned sections or that has been used to ventilate pillar lines shall not be reused to ventilate live workings.

The inspector shall establish by rule ventilation requirements for mines and associated surface facilities. The rules may be generally applicable to all mines or promulgated for specific types of mines or mining operation and may:

Establish minimum and maximum volumes of air required for specified areas of mines;

Specify the means for ventilation, including the use, installation and operation of main mine fans, booster fans, blower fans, exhausting and other fans, and associated equipment including warning and monitoring devices;

Specify the use, placement and construction of crosscuts, doors and line brattice needed to provide ventilation;

Specify personal protective devices to be used to alleviate the effects of dust and harmful gases;

Specify areas of the mine and times for monitoring, and training requirements for persons monitoring ventilation and associated equipment or providing ventilation in accordance with this act or rules adopted under this act;

Establish appropriate procedures for making changes in ventilation;

Specify required actions in response to hazards due to inadequate ventilation, including the existence of specified levels of dust or gases; and

Require recordkeeping in accordance with applicable federal law.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, §§ 27, 28, 33; 1957, ch. 160, § 59; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-94, 30-152, 30-159; W.S. 1977, §§ 30-2-431, 30-3-423, 30-3-434; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1995, ch 31, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Sections 27 and 28, ch. 128, Laws 1951, were compiled as one section in W.S. 1957.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 30-2-101(a)(xv).

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
201.06 (Matthew Bender).

§ 30-3-502.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 31, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 25, related to ventilation by means of fans and their installation, location, use, operation, and power requirements.

§ 30-3-503.
Booster fans prohibited; exceptions; safeguards required when used.

Booster fans are prohibited unless the inspector determines their installation is necessary for the safe operation and proper ventilation of the mine and gives permission in writing to install them. In mines where such fans are now being used their use may be continued but they, and any new installations, shall be surrounded with safeguards established by rule of the inspector and as follows:

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 31, § 2.

In case of booster-fan stoppage, the procedure outlined in this act with respect to stoppage of main fans shall apply to the section of the mine affected;

Inspected at least twice each shift during which the fan operates by a certified official designated by the mine foreman.

The following applies to auxiliary fans with tubing used in underground mines:

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 31, § 2.

The fan tubing of an auxiliary fan shall be maintained in good condition. The discharge end of the tubing shall be kept within forty-five (45) feet of the face, and not more than three hundred fifty (350) feet of the tubing shall be extended from the fan unless otherwise authorized in writing by the inspector to accommodate larger mining equipment.

through (vi) Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 31, § 2.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 26; W.S. 1957, § 30-154; W.S. 1977, § 30-3-425; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1995, ch. 31, §§ 1, 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 30-2-101(a)(xv).

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
201.06 (Matthew Bender).

§§ 30-3-504 through 30-3-508.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 31, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1951, ch. 28, §§ 29-32, and Laws 1957, ch. 160, §§ 39-59, related to air and ventilation requirements in mines.

§ 30-3-509.
Prevention of dust; standards established by rule.

through (f) Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 31, § 2.

The inspector shall by rule establish standards for preventing dust from endangering the safe operation of the mine, including the enclosure of electric motors, switches and controls.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, §§ 12, 35; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-147, 30-161; W.S. 1977, §§ 30-3-418, 30-3-436; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1995, ch. 31, §§ 1, 2.